Utah statutes.
53B-17-603.   Curation and deposit of specimens.
(1)  For purposes of this section:
(a)  "Collections" is defined as provided in Section 9-8-302.
(b)  "Curation facility" means:
(i)  the museum;
(ii)  an accredited facility meeting federal curation standards; or
(iii)  an appropriate state park.
(c)  "Museum" means the Utah Museum of Natural History.
(d)  "Repository" means:
(i)  a facility designated by the museum through memoranda of agreement; or
(ii)  a place of reburial.
(e)  "School and institutional trust lands" are those properties defined in
Section 53C-1-103.
(2)  The museum shall make rules to ensure the adequate curation of all
collections from lands owned or controlled by the state or its subdivisions.
The rules shall:
(a)  conform to, but not be limited by, federal curation policy;
(b)  recognize that collections recovered from school and institutional trust
lands are owned by the respective trust, and shall be made available for
exhibition as the beneficiaries of the respective trust may request, subject
to museum curation policy and the curation facility's budgetary priorities;
(c)  recognize that any collections obtained in exchange for collections found
on school and institutional trust lands shall be owned by the respective
trust; and
(d)  recognize that if, at its discretion, the curation facility makes and
sells reproductions derived from collections found on school or institutional
trust lands, any monies obtained from these sales shall be given to the
respective trust, but the curation facility may retain monies sufficient to
recover the direct costs of preparation for sale and a reasonable fee for
handling the sale.
(3) (a)  The museum may enter into memoranda of agreement with other
repositories located in and outside the state to act as its designee for the
curation of collections.
(b)  In these memoranda, the museum may delegate some or all of its authority
to curate.
(4) (a)  All collections recovered from lands owned or controlled by the state
or its subdivisions shall be deposited at the museum, a curation facility, or
at a repository within a reasonable time after the completion of field work.
(b)  The museum shall make rules establishing procedures for selection of the
appropriate curation facility or repository.
(c)  The rules shall consider:
(i)  whether the permittee, authorized pursuant to Section 9-8-305, is a
curation facility;
(ii)  the appropriateness of reburial;
(iii)  the proximity of the curation facility or repository to the point of
origin of the collection;
(iv)  the preference of the owner of the land on which the collection was
found;
(v)  the nature of the collection and the repository's or curation facility's
ability and desire to curate the collection in question, and ability to
maximize the scientific, educational, and cultural benefits for the people of
the state and the school and institutional trusts;
(vi)  selection of a second curation facility or repository, if the original
repository or curation facility becomes unable to curate the collections under
its care; and
(vii)  establishment of an arbitration process for the resolution of disputes
over the location of a curation facility or repository, which shall include an
ultimate arbitration authority consisting of the landowner, the state
archaeologist or paleontologist, and a representative from the governor's
office.
(d)  The repository or curation facility may charge a curation fee
commensurate with the costs of maintaining those collections, except that a
fee may not be charged to the respective trust for collections found on school
or institutional trust lands.
(5)  The repository or curation facility shall make specimens available
through loans to museums and research institutions in and out of the state
when, in the opinion of the repository or curation facility:
(a)  the use of the specimens is appropriate; and
(b)  arrangements are made for safe custodianship of the specimens.
(6)  The museum shall comply with the procedures of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, regarding publication of its rules in the Utah
State Bulletin and the Utah Administrative Code.
